Nevada, session 83, AB144.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 236.037 is hereby amended to read as follows:
236.037 1. The second Monday in October of each year is
established as “Indigenous Peoples Day” in the State of Nevada.
2. The Governor [is authorized and requested to] shall issue
annually [proclaim August 9 as “Indigenous Peoples Day” to
celebrate the thriving culture and significant value that indigenous
people add to the State of Nevada and the United States of
America.] a proclamation encouraging the observance of
“Indigenous Peoples Day.” The proclamation must, without
limitation:
(a) Call upon the news media, state and local officers, private
nonprofit groups and foundations, schools, businesses and other
public and private entities to bring to the attention of the residents
of the State of Nevada the importance of Indigenous communities
in the State of Nevada;
(b) Acknowledge the culture and history of and significant
contributions and advancements made by Indigenous communities
in the State of Nevada and around the world; and
(c) Promote active engagement by the residents of the State of
Nevada in volunteer stewardship activities that support the
preservation of the distinctive public lands that hold great
importance for Indigenous communities in the State of Nevada
and beyond.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)